nb: Fluorescensgrad: Svak; Middels; Ingen; Sterk; Veldig sterk; Annet
pt-BR: Grau de fluorescência: Fraca; Média; Nenhuma; Forte; Muito forte; Outra
tr: Floresans derecesi: Zayıf; Orta; Yok; Güçlü; Çok güçlü; Diğer
th: เกรดการเรืองแสง: จาง; ปานกลาง; ไม่มี; เข้ม; เข้มมาก; อื่นๆ
pl: Klasa fluorescencji: Słaba; Średnia; Brak; Silna; Bardzo silna; Inna
ko: 형광 등급: 약함; 중간; 없음; 강함; 매우 강함; 기타
en: Fluorescence grade: Faint; Medium; None; Strong; Very Strong; Other
pt-PT: Grau de fluorescência: Ténue; Médio; Nenhuma; Forte; Muito forte; Outro
cs: Fluorescenční stupeň: Slabá; Střední; Žádná; Silná; Velmi silná; Ostatní
vi: Cấp độ huỳnh quang: Mờ; Vừa; Không có; Mạnh; Rất mạnh; Khác
hr-HR: Fluorescentni stupanj: Slabo; Srednje; Nema; Jako; Vrlo jako; Ostalo
ro-RO: Grad de fluorescență: Slab; Mediu; Fără; Puternic; Foarte puternic; Altele
sv: Fluorescensgrad: Svag; Medium; Ingen; Stark; Mycket stark; Övrigt
ru: Степень флуоресценции: Слабая; Средняя; Нет; Сильная; Очень сильная; Другое
es: Grado de fluorescencia: Leve; Media; Ninguno; Fuerte; Muy fuerte; Otro
zh-TW: 螢光等級: 微弱; 中等; 無; 強; 極強; 其他
nl: Fluorescentiegraad: Zwak; Gemiddeld; Geen; Sterk; Zeer sterk; Overige
zh-CN: 荧光等级: 微弱; 中等; 无; 强; 极强; 其他
de: Fluoreszenzgrad: Schwach; Mittel; Keine; Stark; Sehr stark; Sonstige
fi: Fluoresenssin luokka: Heikko; Keskivahva; Ei mitään; Vahva; Erittäin vahva; Muu
hu: Fluoreszcencia fokozat: Halvány; Közepes; Nincs; Erős; Nagyon erős; Egyéb
lt-LT: Fluorescencijos lygis: Silpna; Vidutinė; Nėra; Stipri; Labai stipri; Kita
fr: Grade de fluorescence: Légère; Moyenne; Aucune; Forte; Très forte; Autre
sk-SK: Fluorescenčný stupeň: Slabá; Stredná; Žiadna; Silná; Veľmi silná; Iné
it: Grado di fluorescenza: Debole; Medio; Nessuno; Forte; Molto forte; Altro
da: Fluorescensgrad: Svag; Medium; Ingen; Stærk; Meget stærk; Andet
sl-SI: Fluorescenčna stopnja: Šibka; Srednja; Brez; Močna; Zelo močna; Drugo
ja: 蛍光グレード: 弱い; 中; なし; 強い; 非常に強い; その他
el: Βαθμός φθορισμού: Αχνός; Μεσαίος; Κανένας; Ισχυρός; Πολύ ισχυρός; Άλλο
bg-BG: Степен на флуоресценция: Слаба; Средна; Няма; Силна; Много силна; Друга